Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Tennessee Residence Foundation

4-23-101, 4-23-102. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former §§4-3-101 and4-3-102 (Acts 1974, ch. 443, §§ 1,2; T.C.A. §§ 4-2301, 4-2302), concerning the Tennessee Executive Residence Preservation Foundation and its powers, placement of articles and approval of the governor, were deemed obsolete and were deleted by the code commission in 2005.

4-23-103. Board of directors — Creation of foundation.

The Tennessee residence foundation shall exercise its powers through a board of directors composed of seven (7) members as provided by this section. The spouse of the governor or the governor's designee, if the governor is not married, shall serve on the board of directors. Three (3) additional members, one (1) from each grand division, shall be appointed to the board by the governor. The chair of the Tennessee state museum foundation board shall serve on the board of directors for the Tennessee residence foundation. Two (2) additional members, selected by the governor from the membership of the Tennessee state museum foundation board, shall be appointed by the Tennessee state museum foundation board to serve on the board for the Tennessee residence foundation. In the event the Tennessee state museum foundation ceases to exist, its appointees shall be filled by appointments made by the governor. The members of the board for the Tennessee residence foundation shall receive no compensation for their service, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable travel expenses incurred in the performance of official duties. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The term for any member of the board appointed or selected by the governor shall be coterminous with the term of office of such governor, except that any member may be reappointed. Each director shall serve until a successor is appointed. If a vacancy occurs on the board, it shall be filled by the governor in accordance with this chapter.

The board of directors shall designate one (1) director to serve as president for a one-year term. The board shall also elect to a one-year term of office a vice president and a secretary and such other officers as it deems necessary to perform the business of the foundation.

The board of directors, established in this chapter and acting on behalf of the foundation, is hereby authorized and empowered to expend for the purposes of this chapter any funds appropriated, received by or allocated to the foundation.

The foundation established pursuant to chapter 443 of the Public Acts of 1974, shall no longer have any duties or responsibilities with regard to the executive residence.

The board of directors created under this section shall prepare, consistent with the terms of this section, the appropriate documents to create a foundation and file the same with the proper state and federal agencies. In addition, such board shall prepare bylaws consistent with the terms of this section.

In addition to any other powers conferred by this part, the Tennessee residence foundation created in this section is authorized to raise and spend funds for the renovation, restoration, reconstruction, expansion and upkeep of the executive residence.

Acts 1974, ch. 443, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-2303; Acts 1999, ch. 212, § 1; 2004, ch. 548, § 1; 2005, ch. 267, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1974, ch. 443, referred to in this section, was codified as former §§4-23-101 and4-23-102 and §4-23-103.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee executive residence preservation foundation. OAG 11-41, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (5/5/11).